Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1391.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MINNESOTA LIVESTOCK BREEDERS ASSOCIATION.new text end new text begin $18,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $18,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of agriculture for grants to the Minnesota Livestock Breeders Association. new text end